Washington statutes.
RCW 36.71.080

Hawkers, auctioneers, and barterers must procure license—Issuance of license.

The county legislative authority may, by its order, direct the appropriate county official to issue a license to any person to do any business designated in RCW 36.71.070 for such sum as may be fixed under the authority of RCW 36.32.120(3).

[ 1985 c 91 s 7; 1963 c 4 s 36.71.080. Prior: 1873 p 438 s 3; RRS s 8342.]